Arkansas, session 2025, SB215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-21-108(b), concerning the donation of
real property by a public school district, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) If the board of directors for a school district determines that
real property owned or controlled by the school district is not required for
the present or future needs of the school district and that the donation of
the real property would serve a beneficial educational service for the
citizens of the school district, then the school district may donate real
property to an open-enrollment public charter school, a publicly supported
institution of higher education, a technical institute, a community college,
a not-for-profit organization, a county, a city, an incorporated town, or any
entity thereof for the following limited purposes:
(A) Having the real property preserved, improved,
upgraded, rehabilitated, or enlarged by the donee;
*TNL020*
02/11/2025 8:39:01 AM TNL020

SB215
(B) Providing an open-enrollment public charter school, a
publicly supported institution of higher education, a technical institute, or
a community college with the donated property in which to hold classes; or
(C)(i) Providing community programs and beneficial
educational services, social enrichment programs, or after-school programs.
(ii) Real property donated to an open-enrollment
public charter school, a publicly supported institution of higher education,
a technical institute, or a community college under this subdivision
(b)(1)(C) shall be used exclusively and entirely only for community programs
and beneficial educational services, social enrichment programs, or after-
school programs.
(iii) The provision of housing or another similar
program or benefit shall not qualify as a community program or beneficial
educational service, social enrichment program, or after-school program under
this subdivision (b)(1)(C).
(2) A school district may donate the fee simple title and
absolute interest in real property, without any reservations or restrictions
to the real property, to an open-enrollment public charter school, a publicly
supported institution of higher education, a technical institute, a community
college, a not-for-profit organization, a county, a city, an incorporated
town, or any entity thereof.
(3) If two (2) years after the effective date of consolidation
the real property of the consolidated school district is not used by the
school district for educational purposes and has not been sold, preserved,
leased, or donated, the school district board of directors shall make the
real property available to an open-enrollment public charter school, a
publicly supported institution of higher education, a technical institute, a
community college, a not-for-profit organization, a county, a city, an
incorporated town, or any entity thereof, by donation or low-cost long-term
lease, for the following limited purposes:
(A) Having the real property preserved, improved,
upgraded, rehabilitated, or enlarged by the donee;
(B) Providing an open-enrollment public charter school, a
publicly supported institution of higher education, a technical institute, or
a community college with the donated property in which to hold classes; or
(C)(i) Providing community programs and beneficial
02/11/2025 8:39:01 AM TNL020

SB215
educational services, social enrichment programs, or after-school programs.
(ii) Real property donated to an open-enrollment
public charter school, a publicly supported institution of higher education,
a technical institute, or a community college under this subdivision
(b)(3)(C) shall be used exclusively and entirely only for community programs
and beneficial educational services, social enrichment programs, or after-
school programs.
(iii) The provision of housing or another similar
program or benefit shall not qualify as a community program or beneficial
educational service, social enrichment program, or after-school program under
this subdivision (b)(3)(C).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-21-803(13), concerning the definition of
"public school facility" under the Arkansas Public School Academic Facilities
Program Act, is amended to read as follows:
(13) “Public school facility” means any public school building
or space, including related areas such as improved or unimproved real
property or the physical plant and grounds, that is used for any purpose,
including, without limitation:
(A) An extracurricular activity;
(B) An organized physical activity course as defined in §
6-16-137;
(C) Prekindergarten education;
(D) District administration; or
(E) Delivery of instruction to public school students that
is an integral part of an adequate education as described in § 6-20-2302;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-21-803(17), concerning the definition of
"unused or underutilized public school facility" under the Arkansas Public
School Academic Facilities Program Act, is amended to read as follows:
(17) “Unused or underutilized public school facility” means a
public school facility, academic facility, or other improved or unimproved
real property that:
(A) As a whole or in a significant portion, is not being
used for a public educational, academic, extracurricular, or administrative
purpose and the nonuse or underutilization threatens the integrity or purpose
02/11/2025 8:39:01 AM TNL020

SB215
of the public school facility or other real property as a public education
facility; and
(B) As of August 1, 2017, is Is not subject to:
(i) A lease to a third party for fair market value;
or
(ii) An executed offer to purchase by a third party
for fair market value.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-21-806(a)(7)(A), concerning the required
report from a school district to the Division of Public School Academic
Facilities and Transportation regarding unused or underutilized public school
facilities in each public school district under the Academic Facilities
Master Plan Program, is amended to read as follows:
(7)(A) Submit a report to the division by February 1 January 31
of each year that identifies:
(i) All unused or underutilized public school
facilities in the school district; and
(ii) The unused or underutilized public school
facilities, if any, that are designated in the district's facilities master
plan to be reused, renovated, or demolished as part of a specific committed
project or planned new construction project.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-21-815(c)(1), concerning the lease or
purchase of a school district's unused or underutilized public school
facilities, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a school district
shall make unused or underutilized public school facilities available for
lease or purchase for no more than fair market value to any open-enrollment
public charter school located within the geographical boundaries of the
school district before the school district may donate unused or underutilized
public school facilities as authorized under § 6-21-108.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-21-816(a)(1), concerning requirements to
sell or lease unused or underutilized public school facilities, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a school
02/11/2025 8:39:01 AM TNL020

SB215
district determines that any public school facility, academic facility, or
other real property is no longer needed for school purposes or is unused or
underutilized, the school district may sell, donate, or lease the public
school facility, academic facility, or other real property in accordance with
§§ 6-13-103 and 6-13-620 and this subchapter.
(B) A school district shall notify the division regarding
the unused or underutilized public school facility under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section before it may sell, donate, or lease the public
school facility, academic facility, or other real property under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-21-816(b)(1)(A), concerning an open-
enrollment public charter school's right of first refusal to purchase or
lease an unused or underutilized public school facility, is amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1)(A) If a school district decides to sell, lease, or otherwise
transfer ownership of an academic facility, a public school facility, an
unused or underutilized public school facility, or other real property
belonging to the school district, an open-enrollment public charter school
located within the school district's boundaries shall have a right of first
refusal to purchase or lease the academic facility, public school facility,
unused or underutilized public school facility, or other real property
belonging to the school district for fair market value.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-21-816(b)(3), concerning a school
district's authority to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer a public school
facility, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Subject to the priority list under subdivision (b)(1)(C) of
this section, nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to delay or limit
the authority of a school district to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer a
public school facility, an academic facility, an unused or underutilized
public school facility, or other real property to a an open-enrollment public
charter school on terms agreed to by the school district and open-enrollment
public charter school.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-21-816(h), concerning a school district
02/11/2025 8:39:01 AM TNL020

SB215
or public charter school that fails to comply with requirement related to the
sale or lease of public school facilities, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) The rules promulgated under this section and the Code of Ethics
for Arkansas Educators shall include a provision that requires a school
district to list immediately school district property as unused or
underutilized upon the school district's determination that a public school
facility or other real property belonging to the school district is no longer
necessary for school district purposes or is unused or underutilized.
(2) The division may classify:
(A) Classify a school district that fails to comply with
this section as being in academic facilities distress under § 6-21-811; and
(B) Recommend to the State Board of Education whether a
school district that fails to comply with this section should be placed on
Accredited — Cited Status.
(3) A school district superintendent may be subject to sanctions
under the Code of Ethics for Arkansas Educators if the school district
superintendent fails to comply with this section.
(2)(4) The authorizer may take action under § 6-23-105 on the
charter of a public charter school that fails to comply with this section.

















02/11/2025 8:39:01 AM TNL020